North Carolina, session 2025, SB1024.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

REPEAL OF MULTIYEAR RATE PLANS
SECTION 1. General Rate Case. – G.S. 62-133 is amended by adding a new
subsection to read:
"(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rates for electric public utilities shall be
established only through a general rate case conducted pursuant to this section. The Commission
shall not approve or implement any form of automatic or preauthorized multiyear rate adjustment
mechanism."
SECTION 2.(a) Repeal MYRP. – G.S. 62-133.16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-133.16. Performance-based regulation authorized.
(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
…
(4) "Earnings sharing mechanism" means an annual rate-making mechanism that
shares surplus earnings between the electric public utility and customers over
the a period of time covered by a MYRP.PBR plan.
(5) "Multiyear rate plan" or "MYRP" means a rate-making mechanism under
which the Commission sets base rates for a multiyear period that includes
authorized periodic changes in base rates without the need for the electric
public utility to file a subsequent general rate application pursuant to
G.S. 62-133, along with an earnings sharing mechanism.
…
(7) "Performance-based regulation" or "PBR" means an alternative rate-making
approach that includes decoupling, an earnings sharing mechanism, and one
or more performance incentive mechanisms, and a multiyear rate plan,
including an earnings sharing mechanism, or such other alternative regulatory
mechanisms as may be proposed by an electric public utility.mechanisms.
…
(9) "Rate year" means the year of the MYRP for which base rates are effective.
…
(c) Application. – An electric public utility shall be permitted to submit a PBR
application in a general rate case proceeding initiated pursuant to G.S. 62-133. A PBR application
shall include a decoupling rate-making mechanism, one or more PIMs, and a MYRP, including
both an earnings sharing mechanism mechanism, and proposed revenue requirements and base
rates for each of the years that a MYRP the year that PBR is in effect or a method for calculating
the same. The PBR application may also include proposed tracking metrics with or without
targets or benchmarks to measure electric public utility achievement. The following additional
requirements apply to a PBR application:
(1) The following shall apply to a MYRP:under PBR:
a. The base rates for the first rate year of a MYRP shall be fixed in the
manner prescribed under G.S. 62-133, including actual changes in
costs, revenues, or the cost of the electric public utility's property used
and useful, or to be used and useful within a reasonable time after the
test period, plus costs associated with a known and measurable set of
capital investments, net of operating benefits, associated with a set of
discrete and identifiable capital spending projects to be placed in
service during the first rate year. Subsequent changes in base rates in
the second and third rate years of the MYRP shall be based on
Page 2 Senate Bill 1024-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
projected incremental Commission-authorized capital investments
that will be used and useful during the rate year and associated
expenses, net of operating benefits, including operation and
maintenance savings, and depreciation of rate base associated with the
capital investments, that are incurred or realized during each rate year
of the MYRP period; provided that the amount of increase in the
second rate year under the MYRP shall not exceed four percent (4%)
of the electric public utility's North Carolina retail jurisdictional
revenue requirement that is used to fix rates during the first year of the
MYRP pursuant to G.S. 62-133 excluding any revenue requirement
for the capital spending projects to be placed in service during the first
rate year. The amount of increase for the third rate year under the
MYRP shall not exceed four percent (4%) of the electric public
utility's North Carolina retail jurisdictional revenue requirement that is
used to fix rates during the first year of the MYRP pursuant to
G.S. 62-133, excluding any revenue requirement for the capital
spending projects placed in service during the first rate year. The
revenue requirements associated with any single new generation plant
placed in service during the MYRP for which the total plant in service
balance exceeds five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) shall not
be included in a MYRP, except that combustion turbine generating
units which are not part of a combined cycle generating unit may be
included in the MYRP subject to the four percent (4%) limit identified
in this subdivision. In the alternative, the utility may request and the
Commission may grant, if it deems appropriate, permission to
establish a regulatory asset and defer to such regulatory all or a portion
of the asset incremental costs related to such electric generation
investments to be considered for recovery in a future rate proceeding.
In setting the electric public utility's authorized rate of return on equity
for an MYRP period, the Commission shall consider any increased or
decreased risk to either the electric public utility or its ratepayers that
may result from having an approved MYRP.
b. In a proceeding authorizing a MYRP, PBR plan, the Commission shall
establish a rider to refund amounts related to the earnings sharing
mechanism, and to refund or collect amounts related to PIM rewards
or penalties, and decoupling adjustments.
…
d. In addition to the annual review process set forth in sub-subdivision c.
of this subdivision, the following shall apply:
1. For each quarter of a MYRP, the electric public utility shall
report regarding the status of the approved MYRP projects in
the manner directed by the Commission, including reporting
on any project that is canceled, along with a detailed
explanation regarding the reasons for such cancellation and the
replacement capital spending project, if any. The Commission
may, upon its own motion or petition by the Public Staff, open
a proceeding to examine any potentially unreasonable or
imprudent cancellations of approved capital spending projects
and may initiate a proceeding to adjust base rates as necessary
or direct further action with respect to such canceled project.
Senate Bill 1024-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. In any base rate case immediately following an authorized
MYRP, the electric public utility shall be obligated to report
on its execution of the approved MYRP projects with respect
to any rate year completed as of the date of the filing of the
PBR application, including by explaining any material
differences between the approved MYRP projects and the
actual executed projects.
(2) The proposed decoupling mechanism shall only be applied to residential
customer classes. The Commission shall establish an annual revenue
requirement per residential customer and an appropriate distribution of said
revenue requirement per customer in each month of the year. The established
monthly revenue requirements times the actual number of residential
customers each month shall become the target revenue for the residential
class. Each month, the electric public utility shall defer to a regulatory asset
or liability account the difference between the actual revenue and the target
revenue for the residential class. The changes in revenue requirements for the
second and third rate years shall be allocated to the residential customer class
and divided by the number of residential customers to determine the
appropriate adjustment to the annual revenue requirement per residential
customer that is used to establish the target revenues for the residential class
in the second and third rate years of a MYRP. The electric public utility may
exclude rate schedules or riders for electric vehicle charging, including EV
charging during off-peak periods on time-of-use rates, from the decoupling
mechanism to preserve the electric public utility's incentive to encourage
electric vehicle adoption.
…
(4) Any PIM shall be structured to ensure that, pursuant to subdivisions (1) and
(2) of this subsection, any penalty shall be refunded to customers and any
reward shall be collected from customers and shall be limited such that the
total of all potential and actual PIM incentives or penalties does not exceed
one percent (1%) of the electric public utility's total annual revenue
requirement that is used to fix rates during the first year of the MYRP pursuant
to G.S. 62-133, excluding any revenue requirement for the capital spending
projects to be placed in service during the first rate year, where the PIM is
approved. G.S. 62-133. Any incentives related to demand-side management
and energy efficiency measures pursuant to G.S. 62-133.9(f) shall be excluded
from the limits established in this section and shall continue to be recovered
through the demand-side management and energy efficiency (DSM/EE) rider.
…
(f) Plan Period. – Any PBR application approved pursuant to this section shall remain in
effect for a plan period of not more than 36 12 months.
…
(k) Limitation. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize multiyear rate
plans or automatic rate adjustments outside of a general rate proceeding."
SECTION 2.(b) Conforming Changes. – G.S. 62-133.16, as amended by subsection
(a) of this section, is amended by deleting "MYRP" wherever it appears and substituting "PBR."

STUDY OF PERFORMANCE-BASED RATE MAKING
SECTION 3.(a) PBR Study. – The Utilities Commission shall conduct a study
evaluating the effectiveness of performance-based rate making authorized by S.L. 2021-165. The
study shall include each of the following:
Page 4 Senate Bill 1024-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) An assessment of whether any current performance incentive mechanisms
materially influence utility investment decisions.
(2) A comparison of performance incentive earnings to returns on capital
investments.
(3) An evaluation of the impact of incentive structures that are capped at or near
one percent (1%) of the electric public utility's total annual revenue
requirement.
(4) A comparison of different options to increase or remove caps on performance
incentives.
(5) Any recommendations to better align utility earnings with customer
affordability, reduction in system costs, and avoidance of unnecessary capital
investments.
SECTION 3.(b) Reporting Requirement. – The Utilities Commission shall submit
the study required by subsection (a) of this section to the Joint Legislative Energy Policy
Commission by no later than March 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Utilities Commission the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for purposes consistent with this act.
SECTION 5. Effective Date. – Section 4 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 1024-First Edition Page 5